apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="Roven/ský__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>skej</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skij</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ský</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ského</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skýho</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ského</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skýho</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skému</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skýmu</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ském</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skym</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ským</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skym</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ským</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skej</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skij</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ský</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ský</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ští</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ské</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ský</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skejch</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ských</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ským</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skejch</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ských</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skejma</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skýma</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>skými</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ský</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ští</l><r>ský<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Giovanni__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ho</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ho</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mu</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>m</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>m</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Španěl__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ů</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>um</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ech</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ích</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ama</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pú__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ovi</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ů</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ům</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ech</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ové</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/Yankee__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeové</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeje</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeů</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeům</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeích</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeji</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yankeeové</l><r>Yankee<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Berezovský"><i>Berezov</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Bukovský"><i>Bukov</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Cocteau"><i>Cocteau</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Cousteau"><i>Cousteau</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Dale"><i>Dale</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Depardieu"><i>Depardieu</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Giovanni"><i>Giovanni</i><par n="Giovanni__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Hare"><i>Hare</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jastržembský"><i>Jastržemb</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Joe"><i>Joe</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Joule"><i>Joule</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Levinský"><i>Levin</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Love"><i>Love</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Malinovský"><i>Malinov</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Moore"><i>Moore</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="More"><i>More</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Pú"><i>Pú</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Rousseau"><i>Rousseau</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Rovenský"><i>Roven</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Sokolovský"><i>Sokolov</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Szabó"><i>Szabó</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Veselovský"><i>Veselov</i><par n="Roven/ský__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Vinnetou"><i>Vinnetou</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="White"><i>White</i><par n="Pú__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Yankee"><i></i><par n="/Yankee__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Španěl"><i>Španěl</i><par n="Španěl__np_m"/></e>
